New York, session 2025-2026, A2596.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1 of section 137 of the public service law, as 2 added by section 11 of part O of chapter 58 of the laws of 2024, is 3 amended to read as follows: 4 1. "CLCPA targets" shall mean the public policies established in the 5 climate leadership and community protection act enacted in chapter one 6 hundred six of the laws of two thousand nineteen, including but not 7 limited to the requirement that a minimum of seventy percent of the 8 statewide electric generation be produced by renewable energy systems by 9 two thousand thirty, that by the year two thousand forty the statewide 10 electrical demand system will generate zero emissions, and the procure- 11 ment of at least nine gigawatts of offshore wind electricity generation 12 by two thousand thirty-five, at least fifteen gigawatts of offshore wind 13 electricity generation by two thousand forty, at least eighteen giga- 14 watts of offshore wind electricity generation by two thousand forty- 15 five, at least twenty gigawatts of offshore wind electricity generation 16 by two thousand fifty, six gigawatts of photovoltaic solar generation by EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00195-03-5 A. 2596 2 1 two thousand twenty-five and to support three gigawatts of statewide 2 energy storage capacity by two thousand thirty. 3 § 2. Subdivision 5 of section 66-p of the public service law, as added 4 by chapter 106 of the laws of 2019, is amended to read as follows: 5 5. No later than July first, two thousand twenty-four, the commission 6 shall establish programs to require the procurement by the state's load 7 serving entities of at least nine gigawatts of offshore wind electricity 8 generation by two thousand thirty-five, at least fifteen gigawatts of 9 offshore wind electricity generation by two thousand forty, at least 10 eighteen gigawatts of offshore wind electricity generation by two thou- 11 sand forty-five, at least twenty gigawatts of offshore wind electricity 12 generation by two thousand fifty, and six gigawatts of photovoltaic 13 solar generation by two thousand twenty-five, and to support three giga- 14 watts of statewide energy storage capacity by two thousand thirty. 15 § 3. Paragraph e of subdivision 13 of section 75-0103 of the environ- 16 mental conservation law, as added by chapter 106 of the laws of 2019, is 17 amended to read as follows: 18 e. Measures to achieve six gigawatts of distributed solar energy 19 capacity installed in the state by two thousand twenty-five, nine giga- 20 watts of offshore wind capacity installed by two thousand thirty-five, 21 at least fifteen gigawatts of offshore wind electricity generation by 22 two thousand forty, at least eighteen gigawatts of offshore wind elec- 23 tricity generation by two thousand forty-five and at least twenty 24 gigawatts of offshore wind electricity generation by two thousand fifty, 25 a statewide energy efficiency goal of one hundred eighty-five trillion 26 British thermal units energy reduction from the two thousand twenty-five 27 forecast; and three gigawatts of statewide energy storage capacity by 28 two thousand thirty. 29 § 4. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 30 the amendments to subdivision 1 of section 137 of the public service law 31 made by section one of this act shall not affect the repeal of such 32 section and shall be deemed repealed therewith.